New York, session 2025-2026, S1806.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 138-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 138-b. Permitted entry by peer support advocates. Peer support advo- 4 cates who are certified or licensed by a state agency, or a state 5 authorized entity including the New York certification board, or a 6 nationally recognized accrediting agency or association, and are partic- 7 ipating in the provision of corrections-based substance use disorder 8 treatment and transition services, including but not limited to medica- 9 tion assistant treatment, pursuant to section 19.18-c of the mental 10 hygiene law, shall not be unreasonably denied entry into correctional 11 facilities solely based on such advocates' history of prior incarcera- 12 tion. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 15 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 16 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 17 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05308-03-5